Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2780SS (1) 91 lh/ko S.F. 406 Section 1. Section 135.144, subsections 3, 5, 6, 7, and 8, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 3. Take reasonable measures as necessary to prevent 3 the transmission of infectious disease and to ensure that 4 all cases of communicable disease are properly identified, 5 controlled, and treated. However, such reasonable measures 6 shall not include requiring identification and monitoring of 7 persons who may be at risk of contracting a contagious or 8 infectious disease by virtue of contact with a contagious 9 person in a manner consistent with known or suspected modes 10 of transmission; requiring a person to comply with such 11 identification and monitoring efforts including efforts that 12 infringe on a personâs freedom of association; or establishing, 13 authorizing, or enforcing penalties for a personâs refusal 14 to participate in the identification and monitoring efforts 15 including efforts that infringe on a personâs freedom of 16 association. 17 5. Order Recommend physical examinations and tests and 18 collect the collection of specimens as necessary for the 19 diagnosis or treatment of individuals, to be performed by any 20 qualified person authorized to do so by the department. An A 21 physical examination or test shall not be performed or ordered 22 recommended if the physical examination or test is reasonably 23 likely to lead to serious harm to the affected individual. The 24 affected individual has the ultimate authority in determining 25 whether to submit to the recommended physical examination 26 or testing, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 27 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. The department may 28 isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules 29 implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected 30 individual whose refusal of medical a physical examination or 31 testing results in uncertainty regarding whether the individual 32 has been exposed to or is infected with a communicable or 33 potentially communicable disease or otherwise poses a danger to 34 public health. The length of isolation shall not exceed the 35 -1- LSB 2780SS (1) 91 lh/ko 1/ 6 S.F. 406 longest usual incubation period for the specific communicable 1 disease. 2 6. Vaccinate or order Recommend that individuals be 3 vaccinated with a vaccine approved by the United States food 4 and drug administration as safe and effective against an 5 infectious disease and to prevent the spread of communicable 6 or potentially communicable disease. Vaccinations shall be 7 administered by any qualified person authorized to do so by the 8 department. Prior to administration of a vaccine, an adult 9 or the parent or legal representative of a minor receiving 10 the vaccine shall be provided with the federal vaccine 11 information statement for the vaccine and verbally informed 12 of the known and potential benefits and risks of the vaccine. 13 The vaccination shall not be provided or ordered recommended 14 if it is reasonably likely to lead to serious harm to the 15 affected individual. The affected individual has the ultimate 16 authority in determining whether to submit to the recommended 17 vaccination, and shall not be subject to undue pressure or 18 compulsion to submit to the recommendation. To prevent the 19 spread of communicable or potentially communicable disease, the 20 department may isolate or quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A 21 and the rules implementing chapter 139A and this subchapter , 22 any infected person who is unable or unwilling to undergo 23 vaccination pursuant to this subsection . 24 7. Treat or order Recommend that individuals exposed to 25 or infected with disease receive treatment or prophylaxis. 26 Treatment or prophylaxis shall be administered by any qualified 27 person authorized to do so by the department. Treatment or 28 prophylaxis shall not be provided or ordered recommended if 29 the treatment or prophylaxis is reasonably likely to lead to 30 serious harm to the affected infected individual. The infected 31 individual has the ultimate authority in determining whether to 32 submit to the recommended treatment or prophylaxis, and shall 33 not be subject to undue pressure or compulsion to submit to 34 the recommendation. To prevent the spread of communicable or 35 -2- LSB 2780SS (1) 91 lh/ko 2/ 6 S.F. 406 potentially communicable disease, the department may isolate or 1 quarantine , pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 2 chapter 139A and this subchapter , any infected individual who 3 is unable or unwilling to undergo treatment or prophylaxis 4 pursuant to this section subsection . 5 8. Isolate or quarantine infected individuals or groups of 6 individuals pursuant to chapter 139A and the rules implementing 7 chapter 139A and this subchapter . 8 Sec. 2. Section 135.144, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. Provide a link on the departmentâs 11 internet site for qualified individuals to submit 12 evidence-based information regarding a public health emergency 13 or public health disaster and for members of the public to 14 share their experiences. The department shall adopt rules 15 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subsection, 16 including the criteria a qualified individual must meet to 17 participate. 18 Sec. 3. Section 139A.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. The type and length of isolation or quarantine imposed 21 for a specific communicable disease shall be in accordance with 22 rules adopted by the department. The length of isolation or 23 quarantine shall not exceed the longest usual incubation period 24 for the specific communicable disease. 25 Sec. 4. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph a, 26 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 27 (2) The applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, the 28 applicantâs parent or legal guardian, submits an affidavit 29 signed by the applicant, or if the applicant is a minor, 30 the applicantâs parent or legal guardian, stating that the 31 immunization conflicts with the tenets and practices of a 32 recognized sincerely held religious denomination beliefs 33 of which the applicant is an adherent or member , or if the 34 applicant is a minor, of the applicantâs parent or legal 35 -3- LSB 2780SS (1) 91 lh/ko 3/ 6 S.F. 406 guardian . 1 Sec. 5. Section 139A.8, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 2 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3 b. The exemptions under this subsection do not apply in 4 times of emergency or epidemic as determined and declared by 5 the director. 6